Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. School Buildings and Equipment

§ 3741.
School construction; debt service; taxation.

A school district that issues bonded debt to pay for capital construction costs is authorized under the provisions of sections 428 and 511 of this title to levy ad valorem taxes on the grand list to pay for debt service as it becomes due and payable and shall do so unless otherwise payable from other sources.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 89, eff. March 11, 1998;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 225, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 3742.
Flag display.

Each school district shall erect a flag pole on the building or premises of each public school and, while school is in session, at such times as it directs, shall cause a United States flag, which shall not be lettered or marked in any way, to be displayed. A United States flag and a State flag may be displayed inside the school building. A person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $10.00.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 226, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 3743.
Textbooks, appliances, and supplies.

The board shall select and provide all textbooks, appliances, and supplies required for use in the elementary schools and the textbooks required for use in the secondary schools in the town district that shall be paid for by the district. The selection of textbooks, appliances, and supplies shall be subject to the approval of the superintendent of the schools of the district. The board shall provide nonresident students attending the schools with the necessary textbooks, appliances, and supplies under the rules the Board of Education shall prescribe. The board of school directors with the superintendent shall make the rules and regulations it deems proper for the care and custody of all textbooks, appliances, and supplies.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 93

, § 1, eff. July 1, 1966; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 113.

§§ 3743a-3745.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.